Utah statutes.
59-1-1417.   Burden of proof -- Statutory construction.

(1)  In a proceeding before the commission, the burden of proof is on the petitioner except for determining the following, in which the burden of proof is on the commission:

(a)  whether the petitioner committed fraud with intent to evade a tax, fee, or charge;

(b)  whether the petitioner is obligated as the transferee of property of the person that originally owes a liability or a preceding transferee, but not to show that the person that originally owes a liability is obligated for the liability; and

(c)  whether the petitioner is liable for an increase in a deficiency if the increase is asserted initially after a notice of deficiency is mailed in accordance with Section 59-1-1405 and a petition under Part 5, Petitions for Redetermination of Deficiencies, is filed, unless the increase in the deficiency is the result of a change or correction of federal taxable income:

(i)  required to be reported; and

(ii)  of which the commission has no notice at the time the commission mails the notice of deficiency.

(2)  Regardless of whether a taxpayer has paid or remitted a tax, fee, or charge, the commission or a court considering a case involving the tax, fee, or charge shall:

(a)  construe a statute imposing the tax, fee, or charge strictly in favor of the taxpayer; and

(b)  construe a statute providing an exemption from or credit against the tax, fee, or charge strictly against the taxpayer.



Amended by Chapter 424, 2012 General Session

